South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4705.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (85) firefighting equipment purchased by a volunteer fire department. For purposes of this section, firefighting equipment includes items of tangible personal property enumerated in Section 23-9-25(E), and "volunteer fire department" has the same meaning as set forth in Section 23-9-25. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect July 1, 2026. ----XX----